Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1246.04
Student loans; purchasing, selling, servicing; approval.

The Nebraska Investment Council shall obtain the approval of the United States Department of Education before purchasing, selling, or servicing loans pursuant to sections 72-1246.01 to 72-1246.03.

Laws 1971, LB 152, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 2, § 15.